Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2644
Death, resignation, or removal of conservator.

The court may remove a conservator for good cause, upon notice and hearing, or accept the resignation of a conservator. After his death, resignation or removal, the court may appoint another conservator on such notice as the court may direct. A conservator so appointed succeeds to the title and powers of his predecessor.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 262, UPC § 5-415.

The court sets forth the grounds for "good cause" to remove a conservator. In re Conservatorship of Estate of Marsh, 5 Neb. App. 899, 566 N.W.2d 783 (1997).